District of Columbia statutes.
16-3541

Allegations in petition of relator claiming office.

When a quo warranto proceeding is against a person for usurping an office, on the relation of a person claiming the same office, the relator shall set forth in his petition the facts upon which he claims to be entitled to the office.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 602, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3541.
1973 Ed., § 16-3541.